Hawaii statutes.
§281-73 Quality of liquor; penalty. No
liquor at any time manufactured or sold in the State shall be other than of a
pure quality, according to any applicable legal standard therefor under the
laws of the United States, unadulterated with any mixture of noxious,
deleterious, or poisonous substance.

Any person who manufactures or sells any liquor
of a quality or character contrary to this section, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished as in section 281-102
provided. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §39; RL 1935, §2608; RL 1945, §7261; RL 1955,
§159-72; HRS §281-73]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next